Utah statutes.
11-1-2.   Auditors may rely on certain facts.

Whenever a county legislative body, board of city commissioners, city council, or board of education of any such county, city, or school district shall find or declare that any appropriation or expenditure for which a warrant or warrants are to be issued was or is for interest upon the bonded debt, for salaries, or for the current expenses of such county, city, or school district, such finding or declaration shall conclusively protect the county auditor, city auditor, or clerk of the board of education of any such county, city, or school district, as to such facts, in certifying any warrant or warrants therefor to be within the lawful debt limit of such county, city, or school district.



Amended by Chapter 227, 1993 General Session

